test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-miini_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mííni - ok : # -m inanimate noun, berry AEW NA1
     mííni+NI+Sg: mííni
     mííni+NI+Pl: míínistsi
     mííni+NI+Non: mííni

     mííni+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: nitsííni
     mííni+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: nitsíínistsi
     mííni+NI+Px1Sg+Non: nitsííni

     mííni+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: nitsíínnaani
     mííni+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: nitsíínnaanistsi
     mííni+NI+Px1Pl+Non: nitsíínnaani

     mííni+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: kitsíínnooni
     mííni+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: kitsíínnoonistsi
     mííni+NI+Px21Pl+Non: kitsíínnooni

     mííni+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: kitsííni
     mííni+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: kitsíínistsi
     mííni+NI+Px2Sg+Non: kitsííni

     mííni+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: kitsíínoaawayi
     mííni+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: kitsíínoaawaistsi
     mííni+NI+Px2Pl+Non: kitsíínoaawai

     mííni+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: otsííni
     mííni+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: otsíínistsi
     mííni+NI+Px3Sg+Non: otsííni

     mííni+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: otsíínoaawayi
     mííni+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: otsíínoaawaistsi
     mííni+NI+Px3Pl+Non: otsíínoaawai
